Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 4 CLASSES OF LICENSES AND PERMITS
44-3-410. Liquor-licensed drugstore license - multiple licenses permitted - requirements - rules.

A liquor-licensed drugstore license shall be issued to persons selling malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors in sealed containers not to be consumed at the place where sold. On and after July 1, 2016, except as permitted under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the state and local licensing authorities shall not issue a new liquor-licensed drugstore license if the licensed premises for which a liquor-licensed drugstore license is sought is located:
(1) (a) (I) A liquor-licensed drugstore license shall be issued to persons selling malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors in sealed containers not to be consumed at the place where sold. On and after July 1, 2016, except as permitted under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the state and local licensing authorities shall not issue a new liquor-licensed drugstore license if the licensed premises for which a liquor-licensed drugstore license is sought is located:

Within one thousand five hundred feet of a retail liquor store licensed under section 44-3-409;

For a drugstore premises located in a municipality with a population of ten thousand or fewer, within three thousand feet of a retail liquor store licensed under section 44-3-409; or

For a drugstore premises located in a municipality with a population of ten thousand or fewer that is contiguous to the city and county of Denver, within one thousand five hundred feet of a retail liquor store licensed under section 44-3-409.

Nothing in this subsection (1) prohibits:

The renewal or transfer of ownership of a liquor-licensed drugstore license initially issued prior to July 1, 2016.

A liquor-licensed drugstore licensee from allowing tastings on the licensed premises if the applicable local licensing authority has authorized the liquor-licensed drugstore to conduct tastings on its licensed premises in accordance with section 44-3-301 (10).

On or after January 1, 2017, to qualify for an additional liquor-licensed drugstore license under this section, a liquor-licensed drugstore licensee, or a retail liquor store licensee that was licensed as a liquor-licensed drugstore on February 21, 2016, must apply to the state and local licensing authorities, as part of a single application, for a transfer of ownership of at least two licensed retail liquor stores that were licensed or had applied for a license on or before May 1, 2016, a change of location of one of the retail liquor stores, and a merger and conversion of the retail liquor store licenses into a single liquor-licensed drugstore license. The applicant may apply for a transfer, change of location, and merger and conversion only if all of the following requirements are met:

For purposes of determining whether the distance requirements specified in subsection (1)(b)(I) of this section are satisfied, the distance shall be determined by a radius measurement that begins at the principal doorway of the drugstore premises for which the application is made and ends at the principal doorway of the licensed retail liquor store.

In making its determination on the transfer of ownership, change of location, and license merger and conversion application, the local licensing authority shall consider the reasonable requirements of the neighborhood and the desires of the adult inhabitants in accordance with section 44-3-312.

In addition to any other requirements for licensure under this section or this article 3, a person applying for a new liquor-licensed drugstore license in accordance with this subsection (1)(b) on or after January 1, 2017, or to renew a liquor-licensed drugstore license issued on or after January 1, 2017, under this subsection (1)(b) must:

Provide evidence to the state and local licensing authorities that at least twenty percent of the licensee's gross annual income derived from total sales during the prior twelve months at the drugstore premises for which a new or renewal licenses is sought is from the sale of food items, as defined by the state licensing authority by rule; and

Make and keep its premises open to the public.

Not sell clothing or accessories imprinted with advertising, logos, slogans, trademarks, or messages related to alcohol beverages.

(A) The retail liquor stores that are the subject of the transfer of ownership are located within the same local licensing authority jurisdiction as the drugstore premises for which the applicant is seeking a liquor-licensed drugstore license, and, if any retail liquor stores are located within one thousand five hundred feet of the drugstore premises or, for a drugstore premises located in a municipality with a population of ten thousand or fewer, within three thousand feet of the drugstore premises, the applicant applies to transfer ownership of all retail liquor stores located within that distance. If there are no licensed retail liquor stores or only one licensed retail liquor store within the same local licensing authority jurisdiction as the drugstore premises for which a liquor-licensed drugstore license is sought, the applicant shall apply to transfer ownership of one or two retail liquor stores, as necessary, that are located in the local licensing authority jurisdiction that is nearest to the jurisdiction in which the drugstore premises is located.

(B) Upon transfer and conversion of the retail liquor store licenses to a single liquor-licensed drugstore license, the drugstore premises for which the liquor-licensed drugstore license is sought will be located at least one thousand five hundred feet from all licensed retail liquor stores that are within the same local licensing authority jurisdiction as the drugstore premises or, for a drugstore premises located in a municipality with a population of ten thousand or fewer, at least three thousand feet from all licensed retail liquor stores that are within the same local licensing authority jurisdiction as the drugstore premises.

A person licensed under this section to sell malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors as provided in this section shall:

(I) Purchase malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors only from a wholesaler licensed under this article 3;

(II) (A) Not sell malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors to consumers at a price that is below the liquor-licensed drugstore's cost, as listed on the invoice, to purchase the malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors, unless the sale is of discontinued or close-out malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors.

(B) This subsection (2)(a)(II) does not prohibit a liquor-licensed drugstore from operating a bona fide loyalty or rewards program for malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors so long as the price for the product is not below the liquor-licensed drugstore's costs as listed on the invoice. The state licensing authority may adopt rules to implement this subsection (2)(a)(II).

(III) Not allow consumers to purchase malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors at a self-checkout or other mechanism that allows the consumer to complete the alcohol beverage purchase without assistance from and completion of the entire transaction by an employee of the liquor-licensed drugstore;

(IV) Require, in accordance with section 44-3-901 (11), consumers attempting to purchase malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors to present a valid identification, as determined by the state licensing authority by rule; and

A person licensed under this section on or after January 1, 2017, shall not purchase malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors from a wholesaler on credit and shall effect payment upon delivery of the alcohol beverages.

A liquor-licensed drugstore licensee who complies with this subsection (3) and rules promulgated pursuant to this subsection (3) may deliver malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors to a person of legal age if:

The person receiving the delivery of malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors is located at a place that is not licensed pursuant to this section;

The delivery is made by an employee of the liquor-licensed drugstore who is at least twenty-one years of age and who is using a vehicle owned or leased by the licensee to make the delivery;

The person making the delivery verifies, in accordance with section 44-3-901 (11), that the person receiving the delivery of malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors is at least twenty-one years of age; and

The liquor-licensed drugstore derives no more than fifty percent of its gross annual revenues from total sales of malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors from the sale of malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors that the liquor-licensed drugstore delivers.

The state licensing authority shall promulgate rules as necessary for the proper delivery of malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors and is authorized to issue a permit to any liquor-licensed drugstore licensee that will allow the licensee to deliver the liquors pursuant to the rules and this subsection (3). A permit issued under this subsection (3) is subject to the same suspension and revocation provisions as are set forth in sections 44-3-306 and 44-3-601 for other licenses granted pursuant to this article 3.

Except as provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section, it is unlawful for any owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in a liquor-licensed drugstore to conduct, own either in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in any other business licensed pursuant to this article 3.

An owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in a liquor-licensed drugstore may have an interest in:

An arts license granted under this article 3;

An airline public transportation system license granted under this article 3;

A financial institution referred to in section 44-3-308 (4);

For a liquor-licensed drugstore licensed on or before January 1, 2016, or a liquor-licensed drugstore licensee that was licensed as a liquor-licensed drugstore on February 21, 2016, that converted its license to a retail liquor store license after February 21, 2016, and that applied on or before May 1, 2017, to convert its retail liquor store license back to a liquor-licensed drugstore license, additional liquor-licensed drugstore licenses as follows, but only if obtained in accordance with subsection (1)(b) of this section:

On or after January 1, 2017, and before January 1, 2022, four additional liquor-licensed drugstore licenses, for a maximum of five total liquor-licensed drugstore licenses;

On or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2027, up to seven additional liquor-licensed drugstore licenses, for a maximum of eight total liquor-licensed drugstore licenses;

On or after January 1, 2027, and before January 1, 2032, up to twelve additional liquor-licensed drugstore licenses, for a maximum of thirteen total liquor-licensed drugstore licenses;

On or after January 1, 2032, and before January 1, 2037, up to nineteen additional liquor-licensed drugstore licenses, for a maximum of twenty total liquor-licensed drugstore licenses; and

On or after January 1, 2037, an unlimited number of additional liquor-licensed drugstore licenses.

For a liquor-licensed drugstore that submitted an application for a new liquor-licensed drugstore license before October 1, 2016, additional liquor-licensed drugstore licenses as follows, but only if obtained in accordance with subsection (1)(b) of this section:

On or after January 1, 2019, and before January 1, 2022, four additional liquor-licensed drugstore licenses, for a maximum of five total liquor-licensed drugstore licenses;

On or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2027, up to seven additional liquor-licensed drugstore licenses, for a maximum of eight total liquor-licensed drugstore licenses;

On or after January 1, 2027, and before January 1, 2032, up to twelve additional liquor-licensed drugstore licenses, for a maximum of thirteen total liquor-licensed drugstore licenses;

On or after January 1, 2032, and before January 1, 2037, up to nineteen additional liquor-licensed drugstore licenses, for a maximum of twenty total liquor-licensed drugstore licenses; and

On or after January 1, 2037, an unlimited number of additional liquor-licensed drugstore licenses.

Subsection (4)(b)(V) of this section does not apply to a liquor-licensed drugstore licensee that was licensed as a liquor-licensed drugstore on February 21, 2016, that converted its license to a retail liquor store license after February 21, 2016, and that applied on or before May 1, 2017, to convert its retail liquor store license back to a liquor-licensed drugstore license.

A liquor-licensed drugstore licensed under this section shall not store alcohol beverages off the licensed premises.

A licensed wholesaler shall make all deliveries of alcohol beverages to a liquor-licensed drugstore:

Through a common carrier, a contract carrier, or on vehicles owned by the wholesaler; and

Only to the business address of the liquor-licensed drugstore.

A liquor-licensed drugstore licensed under this section on or after January 1, 2017, shall have at least one manager permitted under section 44-3-427 who works on the licensed premises. The liquor-licensed drugstore shall designate at least one permitted manager on the licensed premises to conduct the liquor-licensed drugstore's purchases of alcohol beverages from a licensed wholesaler. A licensed wholesaler shall take orders for alcohol beverages only from a permitted manager designated by the liquor-licensed drugstore.

A liquor-licensed drugstore that is involved in selling alcohol beverages must obtain and maintain a certification as a responsible alcohol beverage vendor in accordance with part 10 of this article 3.

An employee of a liquor-licensed drugstore who is under twenty-one years of age shall not deliver malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors offered for sale on, or sold and removed from, the licensed premises.

A person licensed under this section that obtains additional liquor-licensed drugstore licenses in accordance with subsection (4)(b)(IV) or (4)(b)(V) of this section may operate under a single or consolidated corporate entity but shall not commingle purchases of or credit extensions for purchases of malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors from a wholesaler licensed under this article 3 for more than one licensed premises. A wholesaler licensed under this article 3 shall not base the price for the malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors it sells to a liquor-licensed drugstore licensed under this section on the total volume of malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors that the licensee purchases for multiple licensed premises.

Source:

L. 2018:

(1)(a)(I), IP(1)(b)(IV), (1)(b)(IV)(B), and IP(4)(b)(IV) amended and (4)(b)(V) and (4)(c) added, (SB 18-243), ch. 366, p. 2202, § 9, effective June 4; entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1007, § 2, effective October 1; (2)(a)(II), (2)(a)(III), and (3) amended and (7) added, (SB 18-243), ch. 366, p. 2202, § 9, effective January 1, 2019.

L. 2020:

(6)(c) amended, (SB 20-032), ch. 28, p. 98, § 1, effective September 14.

44-3-411. Beer and wine license.

A beer and wine license shall be issued to persons selling malt and vinous liquors for consumption on the premises. Beer and wine licensees shall have sandwiches and light snacks available for consumption on the premises during business hours, but need not have meals available for consumption.

Every person selling malt and vinous liquors as provided in this section shall purchase malt and vinous liquors only from a wholesaler licensed pursuant to this article 3; except that, during a calendar year, any person selling malt and vinous liquors as provided in this section may purchase not more than two thousand dollars' worth of malt and vinous liquors from retailers licensed pursuant to sections 44-3-409, 44-3-410, and 44-4-104 (1)(c).

A beer and wine licensee shall retain evidence of each purchase of malt and vinous liquors from a retailer licensed pursuant to section 44-3-409, 44-3-410, or 44-4-104 (1)(c), in the form of a purchase receipt showing the name of the licensed retailer, the date of purchase, a description of the malt or vinous liquor purchased, and the price paid for the purchase. The beer and wine licensee shall retain the receipt and shall make it available to the state and local licensing authorities at all times during business hours.

It is unlawful for any owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in a beer and wine license to conduct, own either in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in any other business licensed pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44; except that the person may have an interest in a license described in section 44-3-401 (1)(j) to (1)(t), (1)(v), or (1)(w), 44-3-412 (1), or 44-4-104 (1)(c) or in a financial institution referred to in section 44-3-308 (4).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1011, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 19-011), ch. 1, p. 9, § 12, effective January 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-409 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-412. Bed and breakfast permit.

In lieu of a hotel and restaurant license, a person operating a bed and breakfast with not more than twenty sleeping rooms that offers complimentary alcohol beverages for consumption only on the premises and only by overnight guests may be issued a bed and breakfast permit. A bed and breakfast permittee shall not sell alcohol beverages by the drink and shall not serve alcohol beverages for more than four hours in any one day.

An applicant for a bed and breakfast permit is exempt from any fee otherwise assessable under section 44-3-501 (3) or 44-3-505 (4)(a), but is subject to all other fees and all other requirements of this article 3.

A local licensing authority may, at its option, determine that bed and breakfast permits are not available within its jurisdiction.

A bed and breakfast permit may be suspended or revoked in accordance with section 44-3-601 if the permittee violates any provision of this article 3 or any rule adopted pursuant to this article 3 or fails truthfully to furnish any required information in connection with a permit application.

It is unlawful for any owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in a bed and breakfast permit to conduct, own either in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in any other business licensed pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44; except that a person regulated under this section may have an interest in other bed and breakfast permits; in a license described in section 44-3-401 (1)(j) to (1)(t), (1)(v), or (1)(w) or 44-4-104 (1)(c); or in a financial institution referred to in section 44-3-308 (4).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1012, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-410 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-413. Hotel and restaurant license - definitions - rules.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, a hotel and restaurant license shall be issued to persons selling alcohol beverages in the place where the alcohol beverages are to be consumed, subject to the following restrictions:

Restaurants shall sell alcohol beverages as provided in this section only to customers of the restaurant and only if meals are actually and regularly served and provide not less than twenty-five percent of the gross income from sales of food and drink of the business of the licensed premises over any period of time of at least one year.

Hotels shall sell alcohol beverages as provided in this section only to customers of the hotel and, except in hotel rooms, only on the licensed premises where meals are actually and regularly served and provide not less than twenty-five percent of the gross income from sales of food and drink of the business of the licensed premises over any period of time of at least one year.

Any hotel and restaurant licensee who is open for business and selling alcohol beverages by the drink shall serve meals between the hours of 8 a.m. and 8 p.m. and meals or light snacks and sandwiches after 8 p.m.; except that nothing in this subsection (1)(c) shall be construed to require a licensee to be open for business between the hours of 8 a.m. and 8 p.m.

A hotel may be designated as a resort complex if it has at least fifty sleeping rooms and has related sports and recreational facilities located contiguous or adjacent to the hotel for the convenience of its guests or the general public. For purposes of a resort complex only, "contiguous or adjacent" means within the overall boundaries or scheme of development or regularly accessible from the hotel by its members and guests.

A resort complex shall designate its principal licensed premises and additional separate, related facilities that are located contiguous or adjacent to the licensed premises of the resort complex. Each related facility shall be identified by the resort complex at the time of initial licensure or upon license renewal. Each related facility shall also be clearly identified by its geographic location within the overall boundaries of the licensed premises of the resort complex. A resort complex may apply for a resort-complex-related facility permit for each related facility at the time of initial licensure, upon license renewal, or at any time upon application by the resort complex.

Customers and guests who purchase alcohol beverages at one related facility are permitted to carry such beverages to other related facilities within the overall licensed premises boundaries of the resort complex.

Each related facility shall remain at all times under the ownership and control of the resort complex licensee. Any subletting or transfer of ownership or change of control of a related facility without proper notification and approval by state and local licensing authorities shall be considered a violation of this article 3 and will be cause for the denial, suspension, revocation, or cancellation of the license of the entire resort complex, including all of its related facilities, pursuant to section 44-3-601.

Except as provided in this subsection (2), for violations of section 44-3-307, and for violations of this article 3 and rules promulgated pursuant to this article 3 that are intentionally authorized by the ownership or management of a resort complex, each related facility shall be considered separately licensed or permitted for the purpose of application of the sanctions imposed under section 44-3-601.

For purposes of this subsection (2), "related facility" means those areas, as approved by the state and local licensing authorities, that are contiguous or adjacent to the resort hotel and that are owned by or under the exclusive possession and control of the resort complex licensee. "Related facilities" shall include:

Those indoor areas or facilities contiguous or adjacent to the licensed premises of the resort complex that are operated under a separate trade name and are used by resort complex patrons;

Related outdoor sports and recreation facilities located contiguous or adjacent to the resort complex that are used by patrons of the resort complex for a fee; and

Distinct areas or facilities contiguous or adjacent to the resort complex that are directly related to the resort complex use.

An institution of higher education, or a person who contracts with the institution to provide food services, that is licensed under this section may apply to be designated a campus liquor complex at the time of initial licensure or upon license renewal.

A licensee shall designate its principal licensed premises and additional separate, related facilities that are located within the campus liquor complex. The licensee may identify each related facility that serves alcohol at the time of initial licensure or upon license renewal. To be approved for a campus liquor complex related facility permit, each related facility must be clearly identified by its geographic location within the boundaries of the campus, including the specific point of service, and each area where alcohol beverages are consumed must be clearly identified by a description and map of the area.

A licensee may apply for a related facility permit for each related facility within the campus liquor complex at the time of initial licensure, upon license renewal, or at any time upon application by the licensee.

To be permitted, each related facility must remain at all times under the ownership or control of the licensee. A licensee that sublets or transfers ownership of, or changes control of, a related facility without notifying and obtaining approval from state and local licensing authorities violates this article 3, and the violation is grounds for denial, suspension, revocation, or cancellation of the campus liquor complex license and all related facility permits in accordance with section 44-3-601.

The institution of higher education shall designate a manager for the campus liquor complex and for each related facility.

Except as provided in this subsection (3), for violations of this article 3 and rules promulgated under this article 3 that are intentionally authorized by the ownership or management of a related facility, each related facility is deemed separately permitted for the purpose of application of the sanctions authorized under section 44-3-601.

For purposes of this subsection (3), "related facility" means those areas approved by the state and local licensing authorities that are on the campus of the institution of higher education licensed under this section and that are owned by or under the exclusive possession and control of the institution of higher education holding the license. "Related facilities" include an area or facility operated under a separate trade name.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article 3 to the contrary, a hotel, licensed pursuant to this article 3, may:

Furnish and deliver complimentary alcohol beverages in sealed containers for the convenience of its guests;

Sell alcohol beverages provided by the hotel in sealed containers, at any time, by means of a minibar located in hotel guest rooms, to adult registered guests of the hotel for consumption in guest rooms if the price of the alcohol beverages is clearly posted. For purposes of this section, "minibar" means a closed container, either nonrefrigerated or refrigerated in whole or in part, access to the interior of which is restricted by means of a locking device that requires the use of a key, magnetic card, or similar device or which is controlled at all times by the hotel.

Enter into a contract with a lodging facility for the purpose of authorizing the lodging facility to sell alcohol beverages pursuant to subsection (4)(b) of this section if the lodging facility and hotel share common ownership and are located within one thousand feet of one another. The alcohol beverages that may be sold pursuant to this subsection (4)(c) must be provided by and subject to the control of the licensed hotel. For purposes of this subsection (4)(c), "common ownership" means a controlling ownership interest that is held by the same person or persons, whether through separate corporations, partnerships, or other legal entities. To determine whether the distance limitation referred to in this subsection (4)(c) is met, the distance from the property line of the land used for the lodging facility to the portion of the hotel licensed under this article 3 shall be measured using the nearest and most direct routes of pedestrian access.

The state licensing authority shall promulgate rules that prohibit the placement of a container of alcohol beverages in a minibar if the container has a capacity of more than five hundred milliliters.

It is the intent of this section to require hotel and restaurant licensees to maintain a bona fide restaurant business and not a mere pretext of such for obtaining a hotel and restaurant license.

Except as provided in subsection (7)(b) of this section, every person selling alcohol beverages as provided in this section shall purchase alcohol beverages only from a wholesaler licensed pursuant to this article 3.

During a calendar year, a person selling alcohol beverages as provided in this section may purchase not more than two thousand dollars' worth of malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors from retailers licensed pursuant to sections 44-3-409, 44-3-410, and 44-4-104 (1)(c).

A hotel and restaurant licensee shall retain evidence of each purchase of malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors from a retailer licensed pursuant to section 44-3-409, 44-3-410, or 44-4-104 (1)(c), in the form of a purchase receipt showing the name of the licensed retailer, the date of purchase, a description of the alcohol beverages purchased, and the price paid for the alcohol beverages. The licensee shall retain the receipt and make it available to the state and local licensing authorities at all times during business hours.

Each hotel and restaurant license shall be granted for specific premises, and optional premises approved by the state and local licensing authorities, and issued in the name of the owner or lessee of the business.

Repealed.

The manager for each hotel and restaurant license, the hotel and restaurant licensee, or an employee or agent of the hotel and restaurant licensee shall purchase alcohol beverages for one licensed premises only, and the purchases shall be separate and distinct from purchases for any other hotel and restaurant license.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

It is unlawful for any owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in a hotel and restaurant license to conduct, own either in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in any other business licensed pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44.

Notwithstanding subsection (14)(a) of this section, an owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in a hotel and restaurant license may conduct, own either in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in a license described in section 44-3-401 (1)(j) to (1)(t), (1)(v), or (1)(w), 44-3-412 (1), or 44-4-104 (1)(c) or in a financial institution referred to in section 44-3-308 (4).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1012, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(7) amended, (SB 19-011), ch. 1, p. 9, § 13, effective January 31.

L. 2022:

(9) and (11) to (13) repealed and (10) amended, (HB 22-1415), ch. 426, p. 3017, § 2, effective June 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-411 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-414. Tavern license.

A tavern license shall be issued to persons selling alcohol beverages by the drink only to customers for consumption on the premises. A tavern licensee shall have sandwiches and light snacks available for consumption on the premises during business hours, but need not have meals available for consumption.

Every person selling alcohol beverages as provided in this section shall purchase alcohol beverages only from a wholesaler licensed pursuant to this article 3; except that, during a calendar year, a person selling alcohol beverages as provided in this section may purchase not more than two thousand dollars' worth of malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors from retailers licensed pursuant to sections 44-3-409, 44-3-410, and 44-4-104 (1)(c).

A tavern licensee shall retain evidence of each purchase of malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors from a retailer licensed pursuant to section 44-3-409, 44-3-410, or 44-4-104 (1)(c), in the form of a purchase receipt showing the name of the licensed retailer, the date of purchase, a description of the alcohol beverages purchased, and the price paid for the alcohol beverages. The tavern licensee shall retain the receipt and make it available to the state and local licensing authorities at all times during business hours.

It is unlawful for any owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in tavern licenses to conduct, own either in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in any other business licensed pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44; except that the person may have an interest in a license described in section 44-3-401 (1)(j) to (1)(t), (1)(v), or (1)(w), 44-3-412 (1), or 44-4-104 (1)(c) or in a financial institution referred to in section 44-3-308 (4).

Repealed.

The manager for each tavern license, the tavern licensee, or an employee or agent of the tavern licensee shall purchase alcohol beverages for one licensed premises only, and the purchases shall be separate and distinct from purchases for any other tavern license.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Repealed.

At the time a tavern license is due for renewal or by one year after August 10, 2016, whichever occurs later, a tavern licensed under this section that does not have as its principal business the sale of alcohol beverages, has a valid license on August 10, 2016, and is a lodging and entertainment facility may apply to, and the applicable local licensing authority shall, convert the tavern license to a lodging and entertainment license under section 44-3-428, and the licensee may continue to operate as a lodging and entertainment facility licensee. If a tavern licensee does not have as its principal business the sale of alcohol beverages but is not a lodging and entertainment facility, at the time the tavern license is due for renewal or by one year after August 10, 2016, whichever occurs later, the licensee may apply to, and the applicable local licensing authority shall, convert the tavern license to another license under this article 3, if any, for which the person qualifies.

A person applying under this subsection (9) to convert an existing tavern license to another license under this article 3 may apply to convert the license, even if the location of the licensed premises is within five hundred feet of any public or parochial school or the principal campus of any college, university, or seminary, so long as the local licensing authority has previously approved the location of the licensed premises in accordance with section 44-3-313 (1)(d).

Source:

L. 2018:

(9)(a) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1696, § 7, effective May 29; entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1017, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(2) amended, (SB 19-011), ch. 1, p. 10, § 14, effective January 31.

L. 2022:

(4) and (6) to (8) repealed and (5) amended, (HB 22-1415), ch. 426, p. 3018, § 3, effective June 7.

44-3-415. Optional premises license.

An optional premises license shall be granted for optional premises approved by the state and local licensing authorities to persons selling alcohol beverages by the drink only to customers for consumption on the optional premises and for storing alcohol beverages in a secure area on or off the optional premises for future use on the optional premises.

It is unlawful for any owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in an optional premises license to conduct, own either in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in any other business licensed pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44.

Notwithstanding subsection (2)(a) of this section, an owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in an optional premises license may own, either in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in a license described in section 44-3-401 (1)(j) to (1)(t), (1)(v), or (1)(w), 44-3-412 (1), or 44-4-104 (1)(c) or in a financial institution referred to in section 44-3-308 (4).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1019, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-413 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-416. Retail gaming tavern license.

A retail gaming tavern license shall be issued to persons who are licensed pursuant to section 44-30-501 (1)(c), who sell alcohol beverages by individual drink for consumption on the premises, and who sell sandwiches or light snacks or who contract with an establishment that provides the food services within the same building as the licensed premises. In no event shall any person hold more than three retail gaming tavern licenses.

Every person selling alcohol beverages as described in this section shall purchase the alcohol beverages only from a wholesaler licensed pursuant to this article 3; except that, during a calendar year, a person selling alcohol beverages as provided in this section may purchase not more than two thousand dollars' worth of malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors from retailers licensed pursuant to sections 44-3-409, 44-3-410, and 44-4-104 (1)(c).

A retail gaming tavern licensee shall retain evidence of each purchase of malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors from a retailer licensed pursuant to section 44-3-409, 44-3-410, or 44-4-104 (1)(c), in the form of a purchase receipt showing the name of the licensed retailer, the date of purchase, a description of the alcohol beverages purchased, and the price paid for the alcohol beverages. The licensee shall retain the receipt and make it available to the state and local licensing authorities at all times during business hours.

Nothing in this article 3 shall permit more than one retail gaming tavern license per building where the licensed premises are located.

It is unlawful for any owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in a retail gaming tavern license to conduct, own either in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in any other business licensed pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44; except that the person may have an interest in a license described in section 44-3-401 (1)(j) to (1)(t), (1)(v), or (1)(w), 44-3-412 (1), or 44-4-104 (1)(c) or in a financial institution referred to in section 44-3-308 (4).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1019, § 2, effective October 1; (1) amended, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 238, § 8, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(2) amended, (SB 19-011), ch. 1, p. 10, § 15, effective January 31.